North Dakota, session 69, SB2166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 57-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Property tax information portal - Report.
1. The commissioner shall develop a property tax information portal that is available to
the public on the commissioner's website to provide information and education to
citizens on property taxes .
2. The property tax information portal must include:
a. Interactive data regarding property tax collections by taxing district for each
parcel, updated at least annually, including historical collections.
b. Contact information of the elected officials of all taxing districts associated with
each parcel.
c. Educational resources, including terminology and tools to estimate potential
property tax changes.
3. At least once per year, or as often as required by the commissioner, county auditors
shall submit timely property tax data and contact information of elected officials of
each taxing district in the county in the form and manner prescribed by the
commissioner, including detailed information on each parcel.
4. As required by law, the commissioner shall protect personally identifiable information
from unauthorized access and disclosure.
Page No. 1 25.0208.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
5. At least once per biennium, the commissioner shall provide a report to the legislative
management regarding the status of the portal, including implementation progress,
costs, and usage statistics.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - TAX COMMISSIONER - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is
appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise
appropriated, the sum of $5,000,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the tax
commissioner for the purpose of developing a property tax information portal, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The funding provided in this section is
considered a one-time funding item.
Page No. 2 25.0208.01000